District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.12

Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 812 of the Uniform Trust Code.